Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-3,114
Petitions; forms; contents; signatures.

All petitions for improvements provided for in sections 14-384 to 14-3,127 shall be upon printed forms prescribed by the city and shall describe the street to be improved and improvement desired. Signatures to such petitions shall have no conditions attached and all signatures shall be acknowledged before a notary public.

Laws 1959, c. 36, § 31, p. 207;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 118.
July 21, 2022